Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 5.2 Pen Registers and Trap and Trace Devices

12-5.2-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Designated offense” means the offenses of:

Murder, robbery, kidnapping, extortion, assault with a dangerous weapon, and assault with intent to rob or murder;

Arson in the first degree, arson in the second degree, or arson in the third degree;

Bribery; larceny involving the receipt of stolen property of a value of more than five hundred dollars ($500);

Any violation of chapter 28 of title 21 where the offense is punishable by imprisonment for more than one year;

Any violation of chapters 19, 47, or 51 of title 11, where the offense is punishable by imprisonment for more than one year;

The lending of money at a rate of interest in violation of law; and

Conspiracy to commit any of the offenses provided in this subdivision;

“Pen register” means a device which records or decodes electronic or other impulses which identify the numbers dialed or otherwise transmitted on the telephone line to which the device is attached, but does not include any device used by a provider or customer of a wire or electronic communication service for billing, or recording as an incident to billing, for communications services provided by the provider or any device used by a provider or customer of a wire communication service for cost accounting or other like purposes in the ordinary course of its business;

“Trap and trace device” means a device which captures the incoming electronic or other impulses which identify the originating number of an instrument or device from which a wire or electronic communication was transmitted;

“Wire communications” has the meaning set forth in §

12-5.1-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 283, § 1.

12-5.2-2.
Application for an order for a pen register or a trap and trace device.

The attorney general or an assistant attorney general designated by the attorney general may make application for an order or an extension of an order pursuant to the provisions of §

12-5.2-3

authorizing or approving the installation and use of a pen register or a trap and trace device under this chapter, in writing under oath or equivalent affirmation, to the presiding justice of the superior court or his or her designee in order to obtain information regarding a designated offense.

Any law enforcement officer set forth in §

12-5-3

may make application for an order or an extension of an order under §

12-5.2-3

authorizing or approving the installation and use of a pen register or a trap and trace device under this chapter, in writing under oath or equivalent affirmation to the presiding justice of the superior court or his or her designee.

An application pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall include:

The identity of the attorney general, assistant attorney general, or the law enforcement officer making the application and the identity of the law enforcement agency conducting the investigation; and

A certification by the applicant that the information likely to be obtained is relevant and necessary to an ongoing criminal investigation, that other investigative procedures have been or are being initiated or conducted, and that the request for the issuance of the pen register and/or trap and trace device is necessary to further an ongoing criminal investigation being conducted by that agency.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 283, § 1.

12-5.2-3.
Issuance of an order for a pen register or a trap and trace device.

Upon an application made pursuant to §

12-5.2-2

, the court shall enter an ex parte order authorizing the installation and use of a pen register or a trap and trace device if the court is reasonably satisfied that the information likely to be obtained by the installation and use is relevant and necessary to further an ongoing criminal investigation and that use of a pen register or trap and trace device is the least intrusive way to obtain the information sought.

An order issued under this section shall specify:

The identity, if known, of the person to whom is leased or in whose name is listed the telephone line to which the pen register or trap and trace device is to be attached;

The identity of the person who is the subject of the criminal investigation;

The number and physical location of the telephone line to which the pen register or trap and trace device is to be attached and, in the case if a trap and trace device, the geographic limits of the trap and trace order;

A statement of the offense to which the information likely to be obtained by the pen register or trap and trace device is relevant; and

Shall direct, upon the request of the applicant, the furnishing of information, facilities, and technical assistance necessary to accomplish the installation of the pen register or trap and trace device under §

12-5.2-4

.

An order issued pursuant to this section shall authorize the installation and use of a pen register or a trap and trace device for a period not to exceed sixty (60) days.

Extensions of the order may be granted only upon an application for an order pursuant to §

12-5.2-2

, and upon the judicial finding required by subdivision (a)(1) of this section. The period of extension shall be a period not to exceed sixty (60) days.

An order authorizing or approving the installation and use of a pen register or a trap and trace device shall direct that:

The order is sealed until otherwise ordered by the court; and

The person owning or leasing the line to which the pen register or a trap and trace device is attached, or who has been ordered by the court to provide assistance to the applicant, not disclose the existence of the pen register or trap and trace device or the existence of the investigation to the listed subscriber, or to any other person, unless or until otherwise ordered by the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 283, § 1.

12-5.2-4.
Assistance in installation and use of pen register or a trap and trace device.

Upon the request of the attorney general, assistant attorney general, or law enforcement officer authorized to install and use a pen register under this chapter, a provider of wire communication service shall immediately furnish the attorney general, assistant attorney general, or law enforcement officer all information, facilities, and technical assistance necessary to accomplish the installation of the pen register unobtrusively, and with a minimum of interference with the services that the person so ordered by the court accords the party with respect to whom the installation and use is to take place, if the assistance is directed by a court order as provided in §

12-5.2-3

.

Upon the request of the attorney general, assistant attorney general, or an officer of a law enforcement agency authorized to receive the results of a trap and trace device under this chapter, a provider of a wire communication service shall immediately install the device on the appropriate line and shall furnish the investigative or law enforcement officer all additional information, facilities, and technical assistance including installation and operation of the device unobtrusively and with a minimum of interference with the services that the person so ordered by the court accords the party with respect to whom the installation and use is to take place, if the installation and assistance is directed by a court order as provided in §

12-5.2-3

. Unless otherwise ordered by the court, the results of the trap and trace device shall be furnished to the attorney general, assistant attorney general, or officer of a law enforcement agency, designated by the court, at reasonable intervals during regular business hours for the duration of the order.

A provider of a wire communication service who furnishes facilities or technical assistance pursuant to this section shall be reasonably compensated for reasonable expenses incurred in providing these facilities and assistance.

No cause of action shall lie in any court against any provider of a wire communication service, its officers, employees, or agents, or other specified persons for providing information, facilities, or assistance in accordance with the terms of a court order under this chapter.

Good faith reliance on a court order, a legislative authorization, or a statutory authorization shall be an absolute defense against any civil or criminal action brought pursuant to this chapter or any other law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 283, § 1.

12-5.2-5.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, its invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 283, § 1.